Massachusetts, session 194th, H963.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 62 of chapter 30 is hereby amended by striking out the definition of
“Environmental justice population”, as appearing in section 56 of chapter 8 of the acts of 2021,
and inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
“Environmental justice population”, a neighborhood that meets 1 or more of the
following criteria: (i) the annual median household income is not more than 65 per cent of the
statewide annual median household income; (ii) minorities comprise 40 per cent or more of the
population; (iii) 25 per cent or more of households lack English language proficiency; (iv)
minorities comprise 25 per cent or more of the population and the annual median household
income of the municipality in which the neighborhood is located does not exceed 150 per cent of
the statewide annual median household income; or (v) the neighborhood is located within ½
of 2

mile of a site which is or has previously been designated a Superfund site as defined by 42 USC
§ 1397h(c)(5); provided, however, that for a neighborhood that does not meet said criteria, but a
geographic portion of that neighborhood meets at least 1 criterion, the secretary may designate
that geographic portion as an environmental justice population upon the petition of at least 10
residents of the geographic portion of that neighborhood meeting any such criteria; provided
further, that the secretary may determine that a neighborhood, including any geographic portion
thereof, shall not be designated an environmental justice population upon finding that: (A) the
annual median household income of that neighborhood is greater than 125 per cent of the
statewide median household income; (B) a majority of persons age 25 and older in that
neighborhood have a college education; (C) the neighborhood does not bear an unfair burden of
environmental pollution; and (D) the neighborhood has more than limited access to natural
resources, including open spaces and water resources, playgrounds and other constructed outdoor
recreational facilities and venues.
of 2